North Carolina statutes. Chapter 166A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.
Article 1A. North Carolina Emergency Management Act.
§ 166A-19.31.
Power of municipalities and counties to enact ordinances to deal with states of emergency.

Authority to Enact Prohibitions and Restrictions. — The governing body of any municipality or county may enact ordinances designed to permit the imposition of prohibitions and restrictions within the emergency area during a state of emergency declared pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.22

. Authority to impose by declaration prohibitions and restrictions under this section, and to impose those prohibitions and restrictions at a particular time as appropriate, may be delegated by ordinance to the mayor of a municipality or to the chair of the board of county commissioners of a county.

Type of Prohibitions and Restrictions Authorized. — The ordinances authorized by this section may permit prohibitions and restrictions:

Of movements of people in public places, including any of the following:

Imposing a curfew.

Directing and compelling the voluntary or mandatory evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the governing body’s jurisdiction.

Prescribing routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with evacuation.

Controlling ingress and egress of an emergency area, and the movement of persons within that area.

Providing for the closure, within the emergency area, of streets, roads, highways, bridges, public vehicular areas, or other areas ordinarily used for vehicular travel, except to the movement of emergency responders and other persons necessary for recovery from the emergency. In addition to any other notice or dissemination of information, notification of any closure of a road or public vehicular area under the authority of this sub-subdivision shall be given to the Department of Transportation as soon as practicable. The ordinance may designate the sheriff to exercise the authority granted by this sub-subdivision.

G.S. 166A-19.70(c)

and (d) shall apply to this sub-subdivision.

Of the operation of offices, business establishments, and other places to or from which people may travel or at which they may congregate.

Upon the possession, transportation, sale, purchase, and consumption of alcoholic beverages.

Upon the possession, transportation, sale, purchase, storage, and use of gasoline, and dangerous weapons and substances, except that this subdivision does not authorize prohibitions or restrictions on lawfully possessed firearms or ammunition. As used in this subdivision, the term “dangerous weapons and substances” has the same meaning as it does under

G.S. 14-288.1

. As used in this subdivision, the term “firearm” has the same meaning as it does under G.S. 14-409.39(2).

Upon other activities or conditions the control of which may be reasonably necessary to maintain order and protect lives or property during the state of emergency.

The ordinances authorized by this section need not require or provide for the imposition of all of the types of prohibitions or restrictions, or any particular prohibition or restriction, authorized by this section during an emergency but may instead authorize the official or officials who impose those prohibitions or restrictions to determine and impose the prohibitions or restrictions deemed necessary or suitable to a particular state of emergency.

When Ordinances Take Effect. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whether general or special, relating to the promulgation or publication of ordinances by any municipality or county, upon the declaration of a state of emergency by the mayor or chair of the board of county commissioners within the municipality or the county, any ordinance enacted under the authority of this section shall take effect immediately unless the ordinance sets a later time. If the effect of this section is to cause an ordinance to go into effect sooner than it otherwise could under the law applicable to the municipality or county, the mayor or chair of the board of county commissioners, as the case may be, shall take steps to cause reports of the substance of the ordinance to be disseminated in a fashion that its substance will likely be communicated to the public in general, or to those who may be particularly affected by the ordinance if it does not affect the public generally. As soon as practicable thereafter, appropriate distribution or publication of the full text of any such ordinance shall be made.

When Prohibitions and Restrictions Take Effect. — All prohibitions and restrictions imposed by declaration pursuant to ordinances adopted under this section shall take effect in the emergency area immediately upon publication of the declaration unless the declaration sets a later time. Publication shall include at least (i) posting of a signed copy of the declaration conspicuously posted on the Web site of the municipality or county, if the municipality or county has a Web site, and (ii) submittal of notice and a signed copy of the declaration to the Department of Public Safety WebEOC critical incident management system. Publication may also consist of reports of the substance of the prohibitions and restrictions in the mass communications media serving the emergency area or other effective methods of disseminating the necessary information quickly. As soon as practicable, however, appropriate distribution of the full text of any declaration shall be made. This subsection shall not be governed by the provisions of

G.S. 1-597

.

Expiration of Prohibitions and Restrictions. — Prohibitions and restrictions imposed pursuant to this section shall expire upon the earliest occurrence of any of the following:

The prohibition or restriction is terminated by the official or entity that imposed the prohibition or restriction.

The state of emergency terminates.

Intent to Supplement Other Authority. — This section is intended to supplement and confirm the powers conferred by

G.S. 153A-121(a)

, G.S. 160A-174(a), and all other general and local laws authorizing municipalities and counties to enact ordinances for the protection of the public health and safety in times of riot or other grave civil disturbance or emergency.

Previously Enacted Ordinances Remain in Effect. — Any ordinance of a type authorized by this section promulgated prior to October 1, 2012, if otherwise valid, continue in full force and effect without reenactment.

Violation. — Any person who violates any provision of an ordinance or a declaration enacted or declared pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor in accordance with

G.S. 14-288.20

A.

History.

Former

G.S. 14-288.12

; 1969, c. 869, s. 1; 1981, c. 412, s. 4(4); c. 747, s. 66; 1989, c. 770, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 194; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2009-146, s. 1. Former G.S. 14-288.13; 1969, c. 869, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 195; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c). Former G.S. 14-288.16; 1969, c. 869, s. 1. Former G.S. 14-288.17; 1969, c. 869, s. 1. 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2019-89, s. 1; 2020-83, s. 11.7.

Cross References.

As to misdemeanor violation of emergency prohibitions and restrictions, see

G.S. 14-288.20

A.

As to waiver of certain dentistry and dental hygiene requirements under Articles 2 and 16 of Chapter 90 during state of emergency declarations, see

G.S. 90-28.5

.

§§ 166A-19.32 through 166A-19.39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Funding of Emergency Preparedness and Response.

§ 166A-19.40.
Use of contingency and emergency funds.

Use of Contingency and Emergency Funds. — The Governor may use contingency and emergency funds:

As necessary and appropriate to provide relief and assistance from the effects of an emergency.

As necessary and appropriate for National Guard training in preparation for emergencies with the concurrence of the Council of State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 6.19(a), effective July 1, 2015.

Use of Other Funds. — The Governor may reallocate such other funds as may reasonably be available within the appropriations of the various departments when all of the following conditions are satisfied:

The severity and magnitude of the emergency so requires.

Contingency and emergency funds are insufficient or inappropriate.

A state of emergency has been declared pursuant to G.S. 166A-19.20(a).

Funds in the State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund are insufficient.

History.

Former G.S. 166A-5; 1951, c. 1016, ss. 3, 9; 1953, c. 1099, s. 3; 1955, c. 387, ss. 2, 3, 5; 1957, c. 950, s. 5; 1975, c. 734, ss. 9, 10, 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 124; 2001-214, s. 2; 2002-179, s. 12; 2009-192, s. 1; 2009-193, s. 3; 2009-196, s. 1; 2009-225, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g). Former G.S. 166A-6; 1951, c. 1016, s. 4; 1955, c. 387, s. 4; 1959, c. 284, s. 2; c. 337, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, ss. 11, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 181(a); 1995, c. 509, s. 125; 2001-214, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2011-183, s. 127(c); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2015-241, s. 6.19(a).

§ 166A-19.41.
State emergency assistance funds.

Governor May Make Funds Available for Emergency Assistance. — In the event of a gubernatorially or legislatively declared state of emergency, the Governor may make State funds available for emergency assistance as authorized by this section. Any State funds made available by the Governor for emergency assistance may be administered through State emergency assistance programs which may be established by the Governor upon the declaration of a state of emergency. It is the intent of the General Assembly in authorizing the Governor to make State funds available for emergency assistance and in authorizing the Governor to establish State emergency assistance programs to provide State assistance for recovery from those emergencies for which federal assistance under the Stafford Act is either not available or does not adequately meet the needs of the citizens of the State in the emergency area.

Emergency Assistance in a Type I Disaster. — In the event that a Type I disaster is declared, the Governor may make State funds available for emergency assistance in the emergency area in the form of individual assistance and public assistance as provided in this subsection.

Individual assistance. — State emergency assistance in the form of grants to individuals and families may be made available when damage meets or exceeds the criteria set out in 13 C.F.R. Part 123 for the Small Business Administration Disaster Loan Program. Individual assistance grants shall include benefits comparable to those provided by the Stafford Act and may be provided for the following:

Provision of temporary housing and rental assistance.

Repair or replacement of dwellings. Grants for repair or replacement of housing may include amounts necessary to locate the individual or family in safe, decent, and sanitary housing.

Replacement of personal property (including clothing, tools, and equipment).

Repair or replacement of privately owned vehicles.

Medical or dental expenses.

Funeral or burial expenses resulting from the emergency.

Funding for the cost of the first year’s flood insurance premium to meet the requirements of the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 4001, et seq.

Public assistance. — State emergency assistance in the form of public assistance grants may be made available to eligible entities located within the emergency area on the following terms and conditions:

Eligible entities shall meet the following qualifications:

The eligible entity suffers a minimum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in uninsurable losses.

The eligible entity suffers uninsurable losses in an amount equal to or exceeding one percent (1%) of the annual operating budget.

For a state of emergency declared pursuant to G.S. 166A-19.20(a) after the deadline established by the Federal Emergency Management Agency pursuant to the Disaster Mitigation Act of 2002, P.L. 106-390, the eligible entity shall have a hazard mitigation plan approved pursuant to the Stafford Act.

For a state of emergency declared pursuant to G.S. 166A-19.20(a), after August 1, 2002, the eligible entity shall be participating in the National Flood Insurance Program in order to receive public assistance for flooding damage.

Eligible entities shall be required to provide non-State matching funds equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the eligible costs of the public assistance grant.

An eligible entity that receives a public assistance grant pursuant to this subsection may use the grant for the following purposes only:

Debris clearance.

Emergency protective measures.

Roads and bridges.

Crisis counseling.

Assistance with public transportation needs.

Emergency Assistance in a Type II Disaster. — If a Type II disaster is declared, the Governor may make State funds available for emergency assistance in the emergency area in the form of the following types of grants:

State Acquisition and Relocation Funds.

Supplemental repair and replacement housing grants available to individuals or families in an amount necessary to locate the individual or family in safe, decent, and sanitary housing, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per family.

Emergency Assistance in a Type III Disaster. — If a Type III disaster is declared, the Governor may make State funds available for emergency assistance in the emergency area in the form of the following types of grants:

State Acquisition and Relocation Funds.

Supplemental repair and replacement housing grants available to individuals or families in an amount necessary to locate the individual or family in safe, decent, and sanitary housing, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per family.

Any programs authorized by the General Assembly.

History.

2001-214, s. 4; 2001-487, s. 98; 2002-24, s. 1; 2002-159, s. 57.5; 2006-66, s. 6.5(a); 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.42.
State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund.

Account Established. — There is established a State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund as a reserve in the General Fund. Any funds appropriated to the Fund shall remain available for expenditure as provided by this section, unless directed otherwise by the General Assembly.

Use of Funds. — The Governor may spend funds from the Fund for the following purposes:

To cover the start-up costs of State Emergency Response Team operations for an emergency that poses an imminent threat of a Type I, Type II, or Type III disaster.

To cover the cost of first responders to a Type I, Type II, or Type III disaster and any related supplies and equipment needed by first responders that are not provided for under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

To provide relief and assistance in accordance with

G.S. 166A-19.41

from the effects of an emergency.

Reporting Requirement. — The Governor shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and to the Chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives on any expenditures from the State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund no later than 30 days after making the expenditure. The report shall include a description of the emergency and type of action taken.

History.

2006-66, s. 6.5(b); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2015-241, s. 6.19(b).

§§ 166A-19.43 through 166A-19.59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 7. Immunity and Liability.

§ 166A-19.60.
Immunity and exemption.

Generally. — All functions hereunder and all other activities relating to emergency management as provided for in this Chapter or elsewhere in the General Statutes are hereby declared to be governmental functions. Neither the State nor any political subdivision thereof, nor, except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, any emergency management worker, firm, partnership, association, or corporation complying with or reasonably attempting to comply with this Article or any order, rule, or regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this Article or pursuant to any ordinance relating to any emergency management measures enacted by any political subdivision of the State, shall be liable for the death of or injury to persons, or for damage to property as a result of any such activity.

Immunity. — The immunity provided to firms, partnerships, associations, or corporations, under subsection (a) of this section, is subject to all of the following conditions:

The immunity applies only when the firm, partnership, association, or corporation is acting without compensation or with compensation limited to no more than actual expenses and one of the following applies:

Emergency management services are provided at any place in this State during a state of emergency declared by the Governor or General Assembly pursuant to this Article, and the services are provided under the direction and control of the Secretary pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.10

, 166A-19.11, 166A-19.12, 166A-19.20, 166A-19.30, and 143B-602, or the Governor.

Emergency management services are provided during a state of emergency declared pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.22

, and the services are provided under the direction and control of the governing body of a municipality or county under

G.S. 166A-19.31

, or the chair of a board of county commissioners under

G.S. 166A-19.22

(b)(3).

The firm, partnership, association, or corporation is engaged in planning, preparation, training, or exercises with the Division, the Division of Public Health, or the governing body of each county or municipality under

G.S. 166A-19.15

related to the performance of emergency management services or measures.

The immunity shall not apply to any firm, partnership, association, or corporation, or to any employee or agent thereof, whose act or omission caused in whole or in part the actual or imminent emergency or whose act or omission necessitated emergency management measures.

To the extent that any firm, partnership, association, or corporation has liability insurance, that firm, partnership, association, or corporation shall be deemed to have waived the immunity to the extent of the indemnification by insurance for its negligence. An insurer shall not under a contract of insurance exclude from liability coverage the acts or omissions of a firm, partnership, association, or corporation for which the firm, partnership, association, or corporation would only be liable to the extent indemnified by insurance as provided by this subdivision.

No Effect on Benefits. — The rights of any person to receive benefits to which the person would otherwise be entitled under this Article or under the Workers’ Compensation Law or under any pension law and the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of Congress shall not be affected by performance of emergency management functions.

License Requirements Suspended. — Any requirement for a license to practice any professional, mechanical, or other skill shall not apply to any authorized emergency management worker who shall, in the course of performing the worker’s duties as such, practice such professional, mechanical, or other skill during a state of emergency.

Definition of Emergency Management Worker. — As used in this section, the term “emergency management worker” shall include any full or part-time paid, volunteer, or auxiliary employee of this State or other states, territories, possessions, or the District of Columbia, of the federal government or any neighboring country or of any political subdivision thereof, or of any agency or organization performing emergency management services at any place in this State, subject to the order or control of or pursuant to a request of the State government or any political subdivision thereof. The term “emergency management worker” under this section shall also include any health care worker performing health care services as a member of a hospital-based or county-based State Medical Assistance Team designated by the North Carolina Office of Emergency Medical Services and any person performing emergency health care services under

G.S. 90-12.2

.

Powers of Individuals Operating Pursuant to Mutual Aid Agreements. — Any emergency management worker, as defined in this section, performing emergency management services at any place in this State pursuant to agreements, compacts, or arrangements for mutual aid and assistance to which the State or a political subdivision thereof is a party, shall possess the same powers, duties, immunities, and privileges the person would ordinarily possess if performing duties in the State, or political subdivision thereof, in which normally employed or rendering services.

History.

1957, c. 950, s. 4; 1975, c. 734, s. 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, c. 714, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, ss. 130, 131; 2002-179, s. 20(b); 2006-81, s. 1; 2008-200, s. 1; 2009-146, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(g), (hhh); 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.61.
No private liability.

Any person, firm, or corporation, together with any successors in interest, if any, owning or controlling real or personal property who, voluntarily or involuntarily, knowingly or unknowingly, with or without compensation, grants a license or privilege or otherwise permits or allows the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of such real or personal property for the purpose of activities or functions relating to emergency management as provided for in this Chapter or elsewhere in the General Statutes shall not be civilly liable for the death of or injury to any person or the loss of or damage to the property of any persons where such death, injury, loss, or damage resulted from, through, or because of the use of the said real or personal property for any of the above purposes, provided that the use of said property is subject to the order or control of or pursuant to a request of the State government or any political subdivision thereof.

History.

1957, c. 950, s. 3; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2012-90, s. 9.

§ 166A-19.62.
Civil liability of persons who willfully ignore a warning in an emergency.

In an emergency, a person who willfully ignores a warning regarding personal safety issued by a federal, State, or local law enforcement agency, emergency management agency, or other governmental agency responsible for emergency management under this Article is civilly liable for the cost of a rescue effort to any governmental agency or nonprofit agency cooperating with a governmental agency conducting a rescue on the endangered person’s behalf if all of the following are true:

The person ignores the warning and (i) engages in an activity or course of action that a reasonable person would not pursue or (ii) fails to take a course of action that a reasonable person would pursue.

As a result of ignoring the warning, the person places himself or herself or another in danger.

A governmental rescue effort is undertaken on the endangered person’s behalf.

History.

1997-232, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§§ 166A-19.63 through 166A-19.69.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 166A-19.70.
Ensuring availability of emergency supplies and utility services; protection of livestock, poultry, and agricultural crops.

Executive Order. — In addition to any other powers conferred on the Governor by law, whenever a curfew has been imposed, the Governor may declare by executive order that the health, safety, or economic well-being of persons or property in this State require that persons transporting essentials in commerce to the curfew area, or assisting in ensuring their availability, and persons assisting in restoring utility services, be allowed to enter or remain in areas from which they would otherwise be excluded for the limited purpose of delivering the essentials, assisting in ensuring their availability, or assisting in restoring utility services.

Maximum Hours of Service Waiver. — As part of an executive order issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or independently of such an order, the Governor may declare by executive order that the health, safety, or economic well-being of persons or property in this State require that the maximum hours of service prescribed by the Department of Public Safety pursuant to

G.S. 20-381

and similar rules be waived for persons transporting essentials or assisting in the restoration of utility services.

Certification System. — The Secretary shall develop a system pursuant to which a person who transports essentials in commerce, or assists in ensuring their availability, and persons who assist in the restoring of utility services can be certified as such. The certification system shall allow for both pre-emergency declaration and post-emergency declaration certification with renewable precertification. The Secretary shall only allow those who routinely transport or distribute essentials or assist in the restoring of utility services to be certified. A certification of the employer shall constitute a certification of the employer’s employees. The Secretary shall create an easily recognizable indicium of certification in order to assist local officials’ efforts to determine which persons have received certification by the system established under this subsection.

Presence in Curfew Area Permitted. — Notwithstanding the existence of any curfew, a person who is certified pursuant to the system established under subsection (c) of this section shall be allowed to enter or remain in the curfew area for the limited purpose of delivering or assisting in the distribution of essentials or assisting in the restoration of utility services and shall be allowed to provide service that exceeds otherwise applicable hours of service maximums, to the extent authorized by an executive order executed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Nothing in this section prohibits law enforcement or other local officials from specifying the permissible route of ingress or egress for persons with certifications.

Abnormal Market Disruptions with Respect to Petroleum. — If the Governor declares the existence of an abnormal market disruption with respect to petroleum pursuant to

G.S. 75-38(f)

, the Governor shall contemporaneously seek all applicable waivers under the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401, et seq., and any other applicable federal law to facilitate the transportation of fuel within this State in order to address or prevent a fuel supply emergency in this State. Waiver requests shall be directed to the appropriate federal agencies and shall seek waivers of the following:

The Reformulated Gasoline requirements throughout the State.

The Federal and State Implementation Plan summertime gasoline requirements (low RVP) throughout the State.

Any other waiver that will, if obtained, facilitate the transportation of fuel within this State.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this section:

Curfew. — Any restriction on ingress and egress to the emergency area of a state of emergency or any restriction on the movement of persons within such an area.

Curfew area. — The area that is subject to a curfew.

Essentials. — Any goods that are consumed or used as a direct result of an emergency or which are consumed or used to preserve, protect, or sustain life, health, safety, or economic well-being of persons or their property. The Secretary shall determine what goods constitute essentials for purposes of this section.

Upon the recommendation of the Commissioner of Agriculture it shall be lawful for the Governor, by an executive order issued pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.20

or independently of such an order, to direct the Department of Public Safety to temporarily suspend weighing, pursuant to

G.S. 20-118.1

, those vehicles used to transport livestock, poultry, or crops from designated counties in an emergency area as defined in

G.S. 166A-19.3(7)

, or counties designated by the Governor in an executive order issued independently of an order pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.20

, if there exists an imminent threat of severe economic loss of livestock or poultry or widespread or severe damage to crops ready to be harvested. The Department of Public Safety shall develop procedures to carry out the provisions of this subsection. This subsection shall not be construed to permit the gross weight of any vehicle or combination in excess of the safe load carrying capacity established by the Department of Transportation on any bridge pursuant to

G.S. 136-72

, or to permit the operation of a vehicle when a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe the vehicle is creating an imminent hazard to public safety. A suspension authorized pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall end when the Governor determines the threat of widespread or severe loss or damage in the designated counties has passed.

History.

2001-214, s. 4; 2001-487, s. 98; 2002-24, s. 1; 2002-159, s. 57.5; 2006-66, s. 6.5(a); 2012-12, s. 1(b); 2013-230, s. 1; 2018-114, s. 7.

§ 166A-19.70A.
Facilitate critical infrastructure disaster relief.

Purpose. — The State finds that it is appropriate to exclude nonresident businesses and nonresident employees who temporarily come to this State at the request of a critical infrastructure company solely to perform disaster-related work during a disaster response period from the following tax and regulatory requirements:

Corporate and individual income tax, as provided under

G.S. 105-130.1

and

G.S. 105-153.2

.

Franchise tax, as provided under

G.S. 105-114

.

Unemployment tax, as provided under G.S. 96-1(b)(12).

Certificate of Authority from the Secretary of State to transact business in this State, as provided under G.S. 55-15-01(d) and G.S. 57D-1-24(d).

Definitions. — In addition to the definitions in

G.S. 166A-19.3

, the following definitions apply in this section:

Corporation. — Defined in

G.S. 105-130.2

.

Critical infrastructure. — Property and equipment owned or used by a critical infrastructure company for utility or communications transmission services provided to the public in the State. Examples of critical infrastructure include communications networks, electric generation, transmission and distribution systems, natural gas transmission and distribution systems, water pipelines, and related support facilities. Related support facilities may include buildings, offices, lines, poles, pipes, structures, and equipment.

Critical infrastructure company. — One of the following:

A registered public communications provider.

A registered public utility.

Disaster-related work. — Repairing, renovating, installing, building, or performing services on critical infrastructure that has been damaged, impaired, or destroyed as a result of a disaster or emergency in an area covered by the disaster declaration.

Disaster response period. — A period that begins 10 days prior to the first day of a disaster declaration and expires on the earlier of the following:

Sixty days following the expiration of the disaster declaration, as provided under G.S. 166A-19.21(c).

One hundred eighty days following the issuance of the disaster declaration.

Employee. — Defined in

G.S. 105-163.1

.

Nonresident business. — An entity that has not been required to file an income or franchise tax return with the State for three years prior to the disaster response period, other than those arising from the performance of disaster-related work during a tax year prior to the enactment of this section, and that meets one or more of the following conditions:

Is a nonresident entity.

Is a nonresident individual who owns an unincorporated business as a sole proprietor.

Nonresident employee. — A nonresident individual who is one of the following:

An employee of a nonresident business.

An employee of a critical infrastructure company who is temporarily in this State to perform disaster-related work during a disaster response period.

Nonresident entity. — Defined in

G.S. 105-163.1

.

Nonresident individual. — Defined in

G.S. 105-153.3

.

Registered public communications provider. — A corporation doing business in this State prior to the disaster declaration that provides the transmission to the public of one or more of the following:

Broadband.

Mobile telecommunications.

Telecommunications.

Wireless Internet access.

Registered public utility. — A corporation doing business in this State prior to the disaster declaration that is subject to the control of one or more of the following entities:

North Carolina Utilities Commission.

North Carolina Rural Electrification Authority.

Federal Communications Commission.

Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

Critical Infrastructure Company Notification. — A critical infrastructure company must provide notification to the Department of Revenue within 90 days of the expiration of the disaster response period. The notification must be in the form and manner required by the Department. The notification must include the following:

A list of all nonresident businesses who performed disaster-related work in this State during a disaster response period at the request of the critical infrastructure company.

A list of nonresident employees who performed disaster-related work in this State for the critical infrastructure company during a disaster response period. The notification must include the amount of compensation paid to the nonresident employee performing disaster-related work in this State.

Nonresident Business Notification. — A nonresident business must provide notification to the Department of Revenue within 90 days of the date the nonresident business concludes its disaster-related work in the State. The notification must be in the form and manner required by the Department. The notification must include a list of nonresident employees who performed disaster-related work in this State during a disaster response period, along with the amount of compensation paid to the nonresident employee performing disaster-related work in this State. Failure to submit a timely notification forfeits the relief provided by this section for the nonresident business.

Limitation. — The intent of this section is to provide relief to nonresident businesses and nonresident employees who would not otherwise be subject to this State’s tax and regulatory requirements if they had not performed disaster-related work during the disaster response period. The relief provided under this section does not apply to any tax year that is part of the disaster response period if the nonresident business or nonresident employee continues to perform disaster-related work following the end of the disaster response period. The relief provided under this section does not apply to a tax year that is part of the disaster response period if the nonresident business or nonresident employee is required to file an income tax return for that tax year with the Department of Revenue for reasons other than the performance of disaster-related work.

History.

2019-187, s. 1(a).

§ 166A-19.71.
Accept services, gifts, grants, and loans.

Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof or of any person, firm, or corporation shall offer to the State, or through the State to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan, for emergency management purposes, the State acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting with the consent of the Governor and through its governing body, may accept such offer. Upon such acceptance the Governor of the State or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the State or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the State or of such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer and the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 8; 1973, c. 803, s. 45; 1975, c. 19, s. 72; c. 734, ss. 13, 14; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 2012-12, s. 1(b).

§ 166A-19.72.
Establishment of mutual aid agreements.

Governor Authorized to Enter Agreements with Other States and Federal Government. — The Governor may establish mutual aid agreements with other states and with the federal government provided that any special agreements so negotiated are within the Governor’s authority.

Governor Authorized to Enter Agreements with Political Subdivisions. — The Governor may establish mutual aid agreements with political subdivisions in the State with the concurrence of the subdivision’s governing body.

Political Subdivisions Authorized to Enter Agreements with Other Political Subdivisions. — The chief executive of each political subdivision, with the concurrence of the subdivision’s governing body, may develop mutual aid agreements for reciprocal emergency management aid and assistance. Such agreements shall be consistent with the State emergency management program and plans.

Political Subdivisions Authorized to Enter Agreements with Political Subdivisions in Other States. — The chief executive officer of each political subdivision, with the concurrence of the governing body and subject to the approval of the Governor, may enter into mutual aid agreements with local chief executive officers in other states for reciprocal emergency management aid and assistance. These agreements shall be consistent with the State emergency management program and plans.

Terms of Agreements. — Mutual aid agreements may include, but are not limited to, the furnishing or exchange of such supplies, equipment, facilities, personnel, and services as may be needed; the reimbursement of costs and expenses for equipment, supplies, personnel, and similar items; and on such terms and conditions as deemed necessary.

History.

1951, c. 1016, s. 7; 1975, c. 734, ss. 14, 16; 1977, c. 848, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1310, s. 2; 2009-194, s. 1; 2012-12, s. 1(b).